Hawaii statutes.
[§658D-6] Consent to jurisdiction.
Conducting arbitration in this State, or making a written agreement to
arbitrate which provides for arbitration within this State subject to this
chapter, shall constitute a consent by the parties to that arbitration or
undertaking to the exercise of in personam jurisdiction by the circuit courts
of this State but only for the purposes of such arbitration. [L 1988, c
186, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next